src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-is_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - komunis : #  o-stem
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: komunis
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: komunis
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: komuniske
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: komunista
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: komuniha
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: komunisko
    komunis+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [komuniskiiro, komuniskiiri, komuniskiire]
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: komuja
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: komujen
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: komujenge
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: komujenna
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: komujensa
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: komujengo
    komunis+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [komujengiiro, komujengiiri, komujengiire]

  Noun - klokkaris : #  o-stem
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: klokkaris
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: klokkaris
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: klokkariske
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: klokkarista
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: klokkariha
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: klokkarisko
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [klokkariskiiro, klokkariskiiri, klokkariskiire]
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: klokkaja
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: klokkajen
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: klokkajenge
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: klokkajenna
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: klokkajensa
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: klokkajengo
    klokkaris+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [klokkajengiiro, klokkajengiiri, klokkajengiire]

  Noun - granitis : #  o-stem
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: granitis
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: granitis
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: granitiske
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: granitista
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: granitiha
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: granitisko
    granitis+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [granitiskiiro, granitiskiiri, granitiskiire]
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: granija
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: granijen
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: granijenge
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: granijenna
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: granijensa
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: granijengo
    granitis+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [granijengiiro, granijengiiri, granijengiire]

  Noun - kompassis : #  o-stem
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: kompassis
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: kompassis
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: kompassiske
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: kompassista
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: kompassiha
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: kompassisko
    kompassis+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [kompassiskiiro, kompassiskiiri, kompassiskiire]
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: kompaja
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: kompajen
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: kompajenge
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: kompajenna
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: kompajensa
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: kompajengo
    kompassis+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [kompajengiiro, kompajengiiri, kompajengiire]
